Missouri, session 2026, HB3422.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.1285, to read as follows:
376.1285. 1. As used in this section, the terms "health carrier" and "health
benefit plan" shall have the same meanings given to the terms in section 376.1350.
2. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that offers or issues health benefit
plans that are delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or
after August 28, 2026, shall provide coverage for annual kidney function screening
services designed to identify patients at risk for chronic kidney disease. Coverage for
such screening services shall include, but is not limited to, glomerular filtration rate
testing, basic metabolic panel testing, and urine testing for screening albumin and
creatinine levels.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a supplemental insurance
policy, including a life care contract, accident-only policy, specified disease policy,
hospital policy providing a fixed daily benefit only, Medicare supplement policy, long-
term care policy, short-term major medical policy of six months' or less duration, or any
other supplemental policy as determined by the director of the department of commerce
and insurance.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.